src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON Numeral

WRITTEN ;
ARABICS ;
ROMAN ;
ISOLATED-NUMEXP ;
NUM-PREFIXES ;

LEXICON WRITTEN ! Numbers are written separately
        нэгэн:нэгэ   NUM-н ; ! "1"
         хоёр:хоёр   NUM   ; ! "2"
       гурбан:гурба  NUM-н ; ! "3"
       дүрбэн:дүрбэ  NUM-н ; ! "4"
        табан:таба   NUM-н ; ! "5"
      зургаан:зургаа NUM-н ; ! "6"
       долоон:долоо  NUM-н ; ! "7"
       найман:найма  NUM-н ; ! "8"
           ес:ес     NUM   ; ! "9"
  юһэн+Use/NG:юһэ    NUM-н ; ! "9"
        арбан:арба   NUM-н ; ! "10"

        хорин:хори   NUM-н ; ! "20"
        гушан:гуша   NUM-н ; ! "30"
        дүшэн:дүшэ   NUM-н ; ! "40"
        табин:таби   NUM-н ; ! "50"
        жаран:жара   NUM-н ; ! "60"
         наян:ная    NUM-н ; ! "80"
        далан:дала   NUM-н ; ! "70"
         ерэн:ерэ    NUM-н ; ! "90"
         зуун:зуу    NUM   ; ! "100"
       мянган:мянга  NUM-н ; ! "1000"

миллион:миллион NUM ;
миллиард:миллиард NUM ;
дүрбэнэй:дүрбэнэй NUM ;
найманай:найманай NUM ;
арбанай:арбанай NUM ;
зуунай:зуунай NUM ;
мянганай:мянганай NUM ;
паар:паар NUM ;
дюжинэ:дюжинэ NUM ;
полста:полста NUM ;


дүшэн:дүшөөд NUM-DIST ; ! ""
мянган:мянгаад NUM-DIST ; ! ""
далан:далаад NUM-DIST ; ! ""

сая:сая NUM "million" ;


LEXICON NUM

+Num%<ord%>:%>д%{A%}хи # ;
+Num%<dim%>:%>х%{A%}н # ;
+Num%<subst%>: case1 ;

LEXICON NUM-н

+Num+Ord:%>д%{A%}хи # ; 
+Num+Dim:%>х%{A%}н # ;
+Num: case3 ;
+Num:н case1 ;

LEXICON NUM-DIST 

+Num+Dist: # ;


!---- from sme



LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES   !!≈ ##  **@CODE@**
                       !!  This lexicon contains a number of letters and other
                       !!  symbols found in front of digits. Their continuation
                       !!  lexicons should probably be changed as we restructure
                       !!  the arabic numerals.
    §:§      ARABIC ; ! §24
   §§:§§     ARABIC ; ! §§24
  §% :§%     ARABIC ; ! § 24
 §§% :§§%    ARABIC ; ! §§ 24
   %-:%-     ARABIC ; ! -24
   %‒:%‒     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2012
   %–:%–     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2013
   %—:%—     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2014
   %―:%―     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2015
   %+:%+     ARABIC ; ! <plus>24
 %-% :%-%    ARABIC ; ! - 24
 %‒% :%‒%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2012
 %–% :%–%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2013
 %—% :%—%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2014
 %―% :%―%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2015
 %+% :%+%    ARABIC ; ! <plus> 24
   %*:%*     ARABIC ; ! *24
   %$:%$     ARABIC ; ! $24
   %€:%€     ARABIC ; ! €24
   %<:%[%<%] ARABIC ; ! <24
   %>:%[%>%] ARABIC ; ! >24
  s%.:s%.    ARABIC ; ! s.24

LEXICON ARABICS
                       ARABIC          ; ! for the arabic numerals
                       ARABICDATE       ; ! for dates
                       ARABICYEAR       ; ! for years
                       ARABICCLOCK       ; ! for time
                       ARABICORD        ; ! for ordinals

LEXICON ARABIC   !!≈ * **@CODE@** arabic numerals
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPS ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPS
 ARABICLOOP      ;
 ARABICSabcdef ;
 ARABICCASES ;
 
LEXICON ARABICSabcdef
 < [a|b|c|d|e|f|f %  f] > ARABICCASE ;
 
LEXICON ARABICDATE
                                      ARABICDATENUM ;
< [1|2|3|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICDATEDOT ;

LEXICON ARABICDATEDOT
 %.%- ARABICDATENUM ;
   %- ARABICDATENUM ;
 %.%– ARABICDATENUM ;
   %– ARABICDATENUM ;

LEXICON ARABICDATENUM
 < [1|2|3|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. > ARABICDATENUM2 ;
 <     [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %. [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %. > ARABICDATENUM2 ;
 <      [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %. [1] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. > ARABICDATENUM2 ;
 <     [1|2|3] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %.   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] %. > ARABICDATENUM2 ;

LEXICON ARABICDATENUM2
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > datetag ;
                              < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > datetag ;
                                                                                datetag ;

LEXICON datetag
 +Num+Sem/Date: # ;

LEXICON ARABICCLOCK
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > CLOCK-sep ;
 
LEXICON CLOCK-sep
   %- ARABICCLOCK2 ;
   %– ARABICCLOCK2 ;
   numclock ;

LEXICON ARABICCLOCK2
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;

LEXICON numclock
 +Num+Sem/Time-clock: ARABICCASES ; !foreløpig

LEXICON ARABICYEAR
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numyear ;

LEXICON numyear
       yeartag  ;
 %/:%/ moreyear ;
 %-:%- moreyear ;
 %–:%– moreyear ;

LEXICON moreyear
                              < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartag ;
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartag ;

LEXICON yeartag
 +Num+Sem/Year: # ;

LEXICON ARABICORD
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPORD ;
                        < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > ARABICLOOPORD ;
                                          1%0%0 ARABICLOOPORD ;

LEXICON ARABICCASES
ARABICCASE0 ;
:%- ARABICCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0
+Num+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE
+Num+Sg+Gen:%>иин #    ;
+Num+Sg+Ins:%>аар #    ;
+Num+Sg+Dat:%>таа   #    ;
+Num+Sg+Acc:%>ие  # ;
+Num+Sg+Abl:%>һөө  #    ;
+Num+Sg+Com:%>тай      #    ;




LEXICON ARABICLOOP   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                           ARABIC          ;
               %-:%-       ARABIC          ; ! 1-2 multipart numbers
               %–:%–       ARABIC          ; ! 1–2 multipart numbers
               %—:%—       ARABIC          ; ! 1—2 multipart numbers
             %.%-:%.%-     ARABIC          ; ! 1.-2 multipart numbers ! !
             %.%–:%.%–     ARABIC          ; ! 1.–2 multipart numbers ! !
             %.%—:%.%—     ARABIC          ; ! 1.—2 multipart numbers ! !
             %-% :%-%      ARABIC          ; ! 1- 2 multipart numbers
             %–% :%–%      ARABIC          ; ! 1– 2 multipart numbers
             %—% :%—%      ARABIC          ; ! 1— 2 multipart numbers
             % %-:% %-     ARABIC          ; ! 1 -2 multipart numbers
             % %–:% %–     ARABIC          ; ! 1 –2 multipart numbers
             % %—:% %—     ARABIC          ; ! 1 —2 multipart numbers
           % %-% :% %-%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 - 2 multipart numbers
           % %–% :% %–%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 – 2 multipart numbers
           % %—% :% %—%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 — 2 multipart numbers
         % %-%-% :% %-%-%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers
         % %–%–% :% %–%–%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 –– 2 multipart numbers
         % %—%—% :% %—%—%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 —— 2 multipart numbers
               %.:%.       ARABIC          ;
               %::%:       ARABIC          ;
               %,:%,       ARABIC          ;
               % :%        ARABIC          ; ! Allowing for "23 500". Lene: Denne er plagsom og bør forbedres. F.eks. 2017 30 vil vi ikke ha om ett tall.
                 :         ARABIC          ; ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char = alt-space)
               %/:%/       ARABIC          ; ! 24/12
             %/% :%/%      ARABIC          ; ! 24/ 12
             % %/:% %/     ARABIC          ; ! 24 /12
                ':'        ARABIC          ; ! 24'12


          ,%-+Num:,%-      ARABICCASES     ; ! 10,-
 ,%-+Num+Err/Orth:.%-      ARABICCASES     ; ! 10.- It is wrong, but written.
               %%:%%       ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".
             % %%:% %%     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.
                           ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD   !!≈ * **@CODE@** ordinals
 +A+Ord:%. # ;




LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer?
 +Num+Err/Orth:' ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984's case.
 +Num+Err/Orth:´  ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984´s case.




!LEXICON MARKDOT
!    +Use/-PMatch:                     #      ;
! < "+Use/Disamb":0 "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" > NUMDOT ; ! sme thing
!LEXICON NUMDOT
!.+CLB:. ENDLEX;



! The Roman numerals !
! ------------------ !

LEXICON ROMAN   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  roman numerals
 +Use/Circ: ROM-THOUSAND ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE ; !

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     M+Use/Circ:M     ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
    MM+Use/Circ:MM    ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
   MMM+Use/Circ:MMM   ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
  MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM  ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG   ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN     ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE     ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT   ; !

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    C+Use/Circ:C    ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CC+Use/Circ:CC   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  CCC+Use/Circ:CCC  ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CD+Use/Circ:CD   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
    D+Use/Circ:D    ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   DC+Use/Circ:DC   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  DCC+Use/Circ:DCC  ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CM+Use/Circ:CM   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

LEXICON ROM-TEN   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    X+Use/Circ:X    ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XX+Use/Circ:XX   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  XXX+Use/Circ:XXX  ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XL+Use/Circ:XL   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
    L+Use/Circ:L    ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   LX+Use/Circ:LX   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  LXX+Use/Circ:LXX  ROM-TEN-TAG ;
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XC+Use/Circ:XC   ROM-TEN-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

LEXICON ROM-ONE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
    I+Use/Circ:I    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II+Use/Circ:II   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III+Use/Circ:III  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV+Use/Circ:IV   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V+Use/Circ:V    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI+Use/Circ:VI   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII+Use/Circ:VII  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX+Use/Circ:IX   ROM-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
  +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
!        +N: ROMNUMTAG ; ! !The Olav viđeš fix (Roman V now gets A)
  +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like
! "Kapihtal II-IV". We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and
! get the +Num tag), or we may send them through a second loop, identical to
! the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do
! this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases like
! "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would
! do the trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ:%- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc. !


! Here goes loop 2.

LEXICON 2ROMAN   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-THOUSAND ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED  ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN      ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE      ;

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     M+Use/Circ:M     2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
    MM+Use/Circ:MM    2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
   MMM+Use/Circ:MMM   2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
  MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM  2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG    ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN     ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE     ;
